Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1238
Nebraska Investment Council; members; qualifications.

(1) Prior to July 1, 2005, the appointed members of the council shall have at least ten years of experience in the financial affairs of a public or private organization or have at least five years of experience in the field of investment management or analysis. For members appointed on or after July 1, 2005, the appointed members of the council shall have at least seven years of experience in the field of investment management or analysis or have at least twelve years of experience in the financial management of a public or private organization. There is a preference for members who are appointed to have experience in investment management or analysis.

(2) The members serving on July 1, 2005, shall serve for the remainder of their five-year terms which will be extended until the date on which the successor's appointment is effective.

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 2, p. 2350;

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 19;

Laws 2005, LB 503, § 5.